Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2507
Power of representatives in transition.

The power of a domiciliary foreign personal representative under section 30-2502 or 30-2506 shall be exercised only if there is no administration or application therefor pending in this state. An application or petition for local administration of the estate terminates the power of the foreign personal representative to act under section 30-2506, but the local court may allow the foreign personal representative to exercise limited powers to preserve the estate. No person who, before receiving actual notice of a pending local administration, has changed his position in reliance upon the powers of a foreign personal representative shall be prejudiced by reason of the application or petition for, or grant of, local administration. The local personal representative is subject to all duties and obligations which have accrued by virtue of the exercise of the powers by the foreign personal representative and may be substituted for him in any action or proceedings in this state.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 213, UPC § 4-206.